Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-427
Rehabilitation hospital, defined.

Rehabilitation hospital means a hospital that provides an integrated program of medical and other services for the rehabilitation of disabled persons.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 27.